Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.115

Limitation on special assessments, rates, and charges.

A special assessment, or rate and charge, on any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property shall not be increased beyond one hundred ten percent of the estimated special assessment, or rate and charge, proposed to be imposed as provided in the resolution adopted in RCW 36.61.070, unless the creation of a lake or beach management district is approved under another mailed ballot election that reflects the weighted voting arising from such increases.

[ 2008 c 301 s 14; 1987 c 432 s 9.]